Louisiana, session 2026, HB449.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 19:12 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§12. Tender of true value refused; costs Court costs; expropriating authority
If the highest amount offered prior to the filing of the expropriation suit is
equal to or more than the final award, the court may, in its discretion, order the
defendant to pay all or a portion of the costs of the expropriation proceedings. All
of the court costs actually incurred because of the expropriation proceeding shall be
paid by the expropriating authority.